Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 5 Awarding Earned-time Allowances

42-5-100.
Termination of board’s power to award earned-time allowances.

The earned-time allowances, which could have been awarded by the board to inmates based upon the performance of the inmate, in effect on December 31, 1983, shall not apply to:

Those persons who commit crimes on or after January 1, 1984, and who are subsequently convicted and sentenced to the custody of the board;

Those persons who have committed a crime prior to January 1, 1984, but who have not been convicted and sentenced as of December 31, 1983, and who are subsequently sentenced to the custody of the board, including those whose sentences have been probated or suspended, on or after January 1, 1984; however, such persons shall receive the full benefit of the earned-time allowances, in effect on December 31, 1983, and shall receive a release or discharge date computed as if they had been sentenced to the custody of the board, prior to December 31, 1983; or

Those persons previously sentenced to the custody of the board, including those whose sentences have been probated or suspended, as of December 31, 1983; however, such persons shall receive the full benefit of the earned-time allowances in effect on December 31, 1983, and shall receive a release or discharge date the same as reflected in the records of such person on December 31, 1983, less any creditable earned time that such person could have earned as a result of forfeited earned time.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-100

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1340, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 42.

Cross references.

Earned time allowance for persons sentenced for a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature, §

17-10-4

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1340, § 2, repealed former Code Section 42-5-100, pertaining to the enumeration of powers of the board regarding granting of earned-time allowances, and enacted the present Code section. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1976, p. 949, § 2; Ga. L. 1978, p. 985, §§ 2-4; and Ga. L. 1980, p. 2002, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note, “Behind Closed Doors: An Empirical Inquiry Into the Nature of Prison Discipline in Georgia,” see 8 Ga. L. Rev. 919 (1974).

42-5-101.
Work incentive credits.

The Department of Corrections is authorized to devise and to provide by agency rule a system of work incentive credits which may be awarded by the department to persons committed to its custody for any felony prison term other than life imprisonment.

Work incentive credits may be awarded by the department to recognize inmates’ institutional attainments in academic or vocational education, satisfactory performance of work assignments made by the penal institution, and compliance with satisfactory behavior standards established by the department.

The department may award up to one day of work incentive credits for each day during which the subject inmate has participated in approved educational or other counseling programs, has satisfactorily performed work tasks assigned by the penal institution, and has complied with satisfactory behavior standards established by the department.

Any work incentive credits awarded an inmate by the department shall be reported by the department to the State Board of Pardons and Paroles which shall consider such credits when making a final parole release decision regarding the subject inmate. The department is authorized to recommend the board apply the work incentive credits to advance any tentative parole release date already established for the subject inmate.

The department also shall report to the State Board of Pardons and Paroles the cases of inmates who decline or refuse to participate in work, educational, or counseling programs, who fail to comply with satisfactory behavior standards, and who therefore refuse to earn work incentive credits.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-101

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 3221, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 42-5-101, pertaining to the applicability of Code Section 42-5-100 to persons sentenced prior to July 1, 1976, was based on Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 24; Ga. L. 1961, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 495, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1399, § 6; Ga. L. 1976, p. 949, § 1; and Ga. L. 1978, p. 985, § 1, and was repealed by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1340, § 2, effective January 1, 1984.